Ohio, session 136, HB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That new section 6109.20 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 6109.20. No public water system shall add fluoride to the water supplied by the system. Section 2. That section 6109.20 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.